ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.aff
# rule/flag 1129 (affects 36498 words, has 216 subrules):
flag j:
	U D	>	-D,T
	U D	>	-D,TKI
	O G A	>	-GA,ID
	O G A	>	-GA,IDKI
	O G A	>	-GA,IGA
	O G A	>	-GA,IGAGI
	O G A	>	-GA,IKS
	O G A	>	-GA,IKSKI
	O G A	>	-GA,IL
	O G A	>	-GA,ILE
	O G A	>	-GA,ILEGI
	O G A	>	-GA,ILGI
	O G A	>	-GA,ILT
	O G A	>	-GA,ILTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IM
	A G A	>	-GA,IMA
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAD
	A G A	>	-GA,IMADKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAGA
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAGAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAID
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAIDKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAIGA
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAIGAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAIKS
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAIKSKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAIL
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAILE
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAILEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAILGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAILT
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAILTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAINA
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAINAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAINI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAINIGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAIS
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAISKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAISSE
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAISSEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAIST
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAISTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAITA
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAITAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAKS
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAKSKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAL
	A G A	>	-GA,IMALE
	A G A	>	-GA,IMALEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMALGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMALT
	A G A	>	-GA,IMALTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMANA
	A G A	>	-GA,IMANAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMANI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMANIGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAS
	A G A	>	-GA,IMASKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMASSE
	A G A	>	-GA,IMASSEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAST
	A G A	>	-GA,IMASTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMAT
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATA
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATE
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATEGA
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATEGAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATEKS
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATEKSKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATEL
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATELE
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATELEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATELGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATELT
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATELTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATENA
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATENAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATENI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATENIGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATES
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATESKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATESSE
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATESSEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATEST
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATESTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATETA
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATETAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMATKI
	A G A	>	-GA,IMGI
	O G A	>	-GA,INA
	O G A	>	-GA,INAGI
	O G A	>	-GA,INI
	O G A	>	-GA,INIGI
	O G A	>	-GA,IS
	O G A	>	-GA,ISKI
	O G A	>	-GA,ISSE
	O G A	>	-GA,ISSEGI
	O G A	>	-GA,IST
	O G A	>	-GA,ISTKI
	O G A	>	-GA,ITA
	O G A	>	-GA,ITAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,KSKI
	I G A	>	-GA,LEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,LGI
	I G A	>	-GA,LTKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,M
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MA
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAD
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MADKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAGA
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAGAGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAID
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAIDKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAIGA
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAIGAGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAIKS
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAIKSKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAIL
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAILE
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAILEGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAILGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAILT
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAILTKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAINA
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAINAGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAINI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAINIGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAIS
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAISKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAISSE
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAISSEGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAIST
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAISTKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAITA
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAITAGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAKS
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAKSKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAL
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MALE
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MALEGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MALGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MALT
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MALTKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MANA
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MANAGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MANI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MANIGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAS
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MASKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MASSE
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MASSEGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAST
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MASTKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MAT
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATA
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATAGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATE
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATEGA
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATEGAGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATEGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATEKS
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATEKSKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATEL
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATELE
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATELEGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATELGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATELT
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATELTKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATENA
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATENAGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATENI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATENIGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATES
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATESKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATESSE
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATESSEGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATEST
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATESTKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATETA
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATETAGI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MATKI
	[EU] G A	>	-GA,MGI
	I G A	>	-GA,NAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,NIGI
	I G A	>	-GA,SKI
	I G A	>	-GA,SSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,STKI
	I G A	>	-GA,TAGI
	O G A	>	-GA,TE
	O G A	>	-GA,TEGA
	O G A	>	-GA,TEGAGI
	O G A	>	-GA,TEGI
	O G A	>	-GA,TEKS
	O G A	>	-GA,TEKSKI
	O G A	>	-GA,TEL
	O G A	>	-GA,TELE
	O G A	>	-GA,TELEGI
	O G A	>	-GA,TELGI
	O G A	>	-GA,TELT
	O G A	>	-GA,TELTKI
	O G A	>	-GA,TENA
	O G A	>	-GA,TENAGI
	O G A	>	-GA,TENI
	O G A	>	-GA,TENIGI
	O G A	>	-GA,TES
	O G A	>	-GA,TESKI
	O G A	>	-GA,TESSE
	O G A	>	-GA,TESSEGI
	O G A	>	-GA,TEST
	O G A	>	-GA,TESTKI
	O G A	>	-GA,TETA
	O G A	>	-GA,TETAGI

# rule/flag 1179 (affects 28911 words, has 76 subrules):
flag k:
	U D	>	-D,KS
	I G A	>	-GA,DE
	I G A	>	-GA,DEGA
	I G A	>	-GA,DEGAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DEKS
	I G A	>	-GA,DEKSKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DEL
	I G A	>	-GA,DELE
	I G A	>	-GA,DELEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DELGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DELT
	I G A	>	-GA,DELTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DENA
	I G A	>	-GA,DENAGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DENI
	I G A	>	-GA,DENIGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DES
	I G A	>	-GA,DESKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DESSE
	I G A	>	-GA,DESSEGI
	I G A	>	-GA,DEST
	I G A	>	-GA,DESTKI
	I G A	>	-GA,DETA
	I G A	>	-GA,DETAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,DKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IDKI
	E G A	>	-GA,IGA
	E G A	>	-GA,IGAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,IKSKI
	E G A	>	-GA,ILEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,ILGI
	E G A	>	-GA,ILTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,INA
	E G A	>	-GA,INAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,INI
	E G A	>	-GA,INIGI
	E G A	>	-GA,ISKI
	E G A	>	-GA,ISSEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,ISTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,ITA
	E G A	>	-GA,ITAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,KSKI
	A G A	>	-GA,LEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,LGI
	A G A	>	-GA,LTKI
	A G A	>	-GA,NAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,NIGI
	A G A	>	-GA,SKI
	A G A	>	-GA,SSEGI
	A G A	>	-GA,STKI
	A G A	>	-GA,TAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,TE
	U G A	>	-GA,TEGA
	U G A	>	-GA,TEGAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,TEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,TEKS
	U G A	>	-GA,TEKSKI
	U G A	>	-GA,TEL
	U G A	>	-GA,TELE
	U G A	>	-GA,TELEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,TELGI
	U G A	>	-GA,TELT
	U G A	>	-GA,TELTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,TENA
	U G A	>	-GA,TENAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,TENI
	U G A	>	-GA,TENIGI
	U G A	>	-GA,TES
	U G A	>	-GA,TESKI
	U G A	>	-GA,TESSE
	U G A	>	-GA,TESSEGI
	U G A	>	-GA,TEST
	U G A	>	-GA,TESTKI
	U G A	>	-GA,TETA
	U G A	>	-GA,TETAGI
