ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.dict
adversatiivsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
agatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ahtmisega/abehiklmny
aktsiisiga/acefijkly
akumulatiivsusiga/ajly
alluvusega/abehiklmny
ameerikastunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
anakondaga/abcdfghiky
antigeeniga/acefijkly
antikvaarsusega/abehklmny
arbuusiga/acefijkly
aristokraatsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
arutlenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
asteenilisiga/ajlny
asunenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
autooliga/acefijkly
avalusiga/ajly
basiliskiga/acefijkly
bilabiaalsusiga/ajly
blondeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
burleskiga/acefijkly
burnusiga/ajly
delikatessiga/acefijkly
dermatoosiga/acefijkly
dialektiga/acefijkly
disjunktsiooniga/acefijkly
dissimulatsiooniga/acefijkly
duralumiiniumiga/abcefhijklmoy
dşiiniga/acefijkly
ehisega/abehiklmny
ekslibristiga/acefijkly
ekspressiivsusega/abehklmny
emasega/abdehijklmnoy
ematusiga/ajly
epileptikuga/abcdefgikmoy
erimiga/abcehijlmoy
essiivsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
faasilisusiga/ajly
falangiga/acefijkly
filoloogilisusega/abehklmny
fiğbeiniga/acefijkly
fuurialikega/ajlmny
gaasisega/abdehjklmnoy
graanuleiga/acejl
günekoloogiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
hakituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
harevusega/abehklmny
hasardiga/aceijly
helmintoosiga/acefijkly
hemolüütilisusiga/ajly
hokiga/abcefhijkly
homoseksualismiga/acefijkly
huumusesusiga/ajly
häirunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hõõguvusiga/ajly
hüperbooliga/acefijkly
iherusiga/ajly
imaamiga/acefijkly
impressiooniga/acefijkly
integreeruvusega/abehklmny
intellektiga/acefijkly
itkutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
jaksanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
joonikuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
jupitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
jäigemaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
jõudlematuga/abcdefgkmoy
jüngreiga/acejl
kahjulikega/ajlmny
kahmitsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kallutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kannatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kaproneiga/acejl
kartoteegitavusega/abehklmny
kasseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kaverniga/acefijkly
keelustanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
keraamilisiga/ajlny
kibaga/abcfhiky
kiimelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kilpjusega/abehklmny
kiprunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
klassitsismiga/acefijkly
klastilisega/abdhjlmny
kogemuslikuga/acdegjlmy
kohmetuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
kollasusiga/ajly
komparatsiooniga/acefijkly
kompromislikega/ajlmny
kontraarsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
kontserteerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kopsanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
korrektiiviga/acefijkly
koverkotiga/aceijly
kriisanud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
krohviga/acefijkly
kujunenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kukalmisiga/ajlny
kurrulisiga/ajlny
kuuendusega/abehklmny
käendusiga/ajly
kärmega/abcdefhjklmnoy
kääriga/acefijkly
kõmpsinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kõrsiga/ajly
külmlaga/abcdefgikmnoy
kümnesiga/ajlny
lahendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lahjutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
laostunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
laskjaga/abcdefgikmnoy
leemisiga/ajly
leivasega/abdehjklmnoy
leprosooriumeiga/acejl
liigutavusega/abehklmny
liitlaslikuga/acdegjlmy
loendusega/abehiklmny
loguskiga/abcehijlmoy
loputisiga/ajly
lorinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
läigitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lämpavusega/abehklmny
lõpuga/acdegijlmy
lõõskajaga/abcdefgkmnoy
maanilisiga/ajlny
mahutavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
maltusianismiga/acefijkly
masturbatsiooniga/acefijkly
matistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
merkantilismiga/acefijkly
metoodikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
misjoneiga/acejl
moonakaga/abcdefgikmnoy
motoriseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
muslimiga/abcehijlmoy
mutageeniga/acefijkly
määramatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
mõmisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mühkamiga/abcehijlmoy
nabisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
napakusiga/ajly
nepaallasega/abehiklmny
nihutiga/abcehijlmoy
nopituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
normatiivsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
näidustanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
näosusega/abehiklmny
nõtrusiga/ajly
nümfomaaniaga/abcdefgikmnoy
oksuslikuga/acdegjlmy
opaaliga/acefijkly
organiga/abcehijlmoy
padespanniga/acefijkly
padjaga/abcfiky
palgilisiga/ajlny
paneelinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pareesiga/acefijkly
patoloogiga/acefijkly
peatusiga/ajly
personaalsusega/abehklmny
personifikatsiooniga/acefijkly
piitsjusiga/ajly
pilkavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
piserdeiga/ajl
plekitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
plutooniumeiga/acejl
poolusega/abehiklmny
poosiga/acefijkly
pretsiissega/abcdefhjklmnoy
printsiibilisusega/abehklmny
protesteerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
publikuga/abcdefgikmoy
puiklikuga/acdegjlmy
purustatavusega/abehiklmny
putkunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
põimikulisiga/ajlny
põiminud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
püstitunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
püütavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
raksatusiga/ajly
rapsoodiga/acefijkly
reegliga/abcehijlmoy
religioossusega/abehklmny
repeteerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
riipinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
riivilisusega/abehklmny
roimiga/ajly
roolisusega/abehklmny
rutulisusiga/ajly
rännakuga/abcdefgikmoy
röögatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
rüüpavusega/abehklmny
sahminud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
samojedoloogiga/acefijkly
sarlakilisega/abdhjlmny
seisatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
seitsmelisega/abdhjlmny
servanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sidumatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
silitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sisinaga/abcdefgikmnoy
soniga/acefijkly
soobliga/abcehijlmoy
stagnatsiooniga/acefijkly
strekiga/aceijly
sulandunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sälganud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sälgulisiga/ajlny
söötnud/achijklmnopqrstuvwyz
süstikulisega/abdhjlmny
taftiga/acefijkly
tapelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
targutlusiga/ajly
telefoniseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tervislikega/ajlmny
tikitavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
tonaalsusega/abehiklmny
toovaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
transparentsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
tseremoniaalsusiga/ajly
tsükloidsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
tupjusega/abehklmny
tuğituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
tärkega/abehiklmny
töötusega/abehiklmny
tüllilisusiga/ajly
ulgunud/afijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vabadusetuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
vabarnaga/abcdefgikmnoy
vallatelnud/abcdfghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
varieerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vedelaga/abcdefgijklmnoy
vihakaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
viidanud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vilumatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
volframeiga/acejl
voolega/abcefhiklmny
värdavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
võimekusiga/ajly
võrdlevaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
ğatäänusega/abehklmny
ğuaaniga/acefijkly
öördavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
